Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-808
Losses; officers; liability.

If the officers and directors of an assessment association fail or refuse, after receiving notice of a loss, to act upon the notice of loss, they shall render themselves individually liable therefor, and an action may be maintained against them to collect such amount.

Laws 1913, c. 154, § 130, p. 464;

R.S.1913, § 3267;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. X, § 7, p. 645;

C.S.1922, § 7866;

C.S.1929, § 44-907;

R.S.1943, § 44-808;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 164.

Officers and directors have such direct interest in result of suit against company for compensation for employee's death as to disqualify them as witnesses as to transactions between them and deceased against latter's legal representative. Priest v. Business Men's Protective Assn., 117 Neb. 198, 220 N.W. 255 (1928).